foma/csold.lexc
LEXICON AdjMposs

+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Nom:^óv    #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Nom:^uov   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Nom:^ův    #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Gen:^ova   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Dat:^ovu   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Acc:^ova   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Voc:^óv    #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Voc:^uov   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Voc:^ův    #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Loc:^ově   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Sg+Ins:^ovým  #;
+AMposs+Masc+Pl+Nom:^ovi   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Pl+Gen:^ových #;
+AMposs+Masc+Pl+Dat:^ovým  #;
+AMposs+Masc+Pl+Acc:^ovy   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Pl+Voc:^ovi   #;
+AMposs+Masc+Pl+Loc:^ových #;
+AMposs+Masc+Pl+Ins:^ovými #;

+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Nom:^ova    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Gen:^ovy    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Dat:^ově    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Acc:^ovu    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Voc:^ova    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Loc:^ově    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Ins:^ovú    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Sg+Ins:^ovou   #;
+AMposs+Fem+Pl+Nom:^ovy    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Pl+Gen:^ových  #;
+AMposs+Fem+Pl+Dat:^ovým   #;
+AMposs+Fem+Pl+Acc:^ovy    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Pl+Voc:^ovy    #;
+AMposs+Fem+Pl+Loc:^ových  #;
+AMposs+Fem+Pl+Ins:^ovými  #;

+AMposs+Neut+Sg+Nom:^ovo   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Sg+Gen:^ova   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Sg+Dat:^ovu   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Sg+Acc:^ovo   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Sg+Voc:^ovo   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Sg+Loc:^ově   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Sg+Ins:^ovým  #;
+AMposs+Neut+Pl+Nom:^ova   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Pl+Gen:^ových #;
+AMposs+Neut+Pl+Dat:^ovým  #;
+AMposs+Neut+Pl+Acc:^ova   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Pl+Voc:^ova   #;
+AMposs+Neut+Pl+Loc:^ových #;
+AMposs+Neut+Pl+Ins:^ovými #;

LEXICON AdjSup

@P.SUP.ON@Sup+:@P.SUP.ON@nej Adj;
@P.SUP.ON@Sup+:@P.SUP.ON@naj Adj;

LEXICON AyDeg

@D.SUP@+Pos:@D.SUP@     Ay;
+Comp:^ejš Ai;

LEXICON Ay1Deg

@D.SUP@+Pos:@D.SUP@     Ay;
+Comp:^š   Ai;

LEXICON AiDeg

@D.SUP@+Pos:@D.SUP@     Ai;
+Comp:^ejš Ai;

LEXICON Ay

+A+Masc+Sg+Nom:^ý   #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Gen:^ého #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Dat:^ému #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Acc:^ého #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Voc:^ý   #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Loc:^ém  #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Ins:^ým  #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Nom:^í   #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Gen:^ých #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Dat:^ým  #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Acc:^é   #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Voc:^í   #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Loc:^ých #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Ins:^ými #;

+A+Mina+Sg+Nom:^ý   #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Gen:^ého #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Dat:^ému #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Acc:^ý   #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Voc:^ý   #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Loc:^ém  #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Ins:^ým  #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Nom:^é   #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Gen:^ých #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Dat:^ým  #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Acc:^é   #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Voc:^é   #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Loc:^ých #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Ins:^ými #;

+A+Fem+Sg+Nom:^á   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen:^é   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen:^éj  #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat:^é   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat:^éj  #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc:^ou  #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc:^ú   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Voc:^á   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Loc:^é   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Loc:^éj  #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins:^ou  #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins:^ú   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Nom:^é   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Gen:^ých #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Dat:^ým  #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Acc:^é   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Voc:^é   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Loc:^ých #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Ins:^ými #;

+A+Neut+Sg+Nom:^é   #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Gen:^ého #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Dat:^ému #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Acc:^é   #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Voc:^é   #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Loc:^ém  #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Ins:^ým  #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Nom:^á   #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Gen:^ých #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Dat:^ým  #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Acc:^á   #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Voc:^á   #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Loc:^ých #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Ins:^ými #;

LEXICON Ax

+Ax+Masc+Sg+Nom:^λ #;
+Ax+Masc+Sg+Acc:^a #;
+Ax+Masc+Pl+Nom:^i #;
+Ax+Masc+Pl+Acc:^y #;

+Ax+Mina+Sg+Nom:^λ #;
+Ax+Mina+Sg+Acc:^λ #;
+Ax+Mina+Pl+Nom:^y #;
+Ax+Mina+Pl+Acc:^y #;

+Ax+Fem+Sg+Nom:^a #;
+Ax+Fem+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+Ax+Fem+Pl+Nom:^y #;
+Ax+Fem+Pl+Acc:^y #;

+Ax+Neut+Sg+Nom:^o #;
+Ax+Neut+Sg+Acc:^o #;
+Ax+Neut+Pl+Nom:^a #;
+Ax+Neut+Pl+Acc:^a #;

LEXICON Ai

+A+Masc+Sg+Nom:^í    #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Gen:^ího  #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Gen:^ieho #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Dat:^ímu  #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Dat:^iemu #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Acc:^ího  #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Acc:^ieho #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Voc:^í    #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Loc:^ím   #;
+A+Masc+Sg+Loc:^iem  #; ! bližniem
+A+Masc+Sg+Ins:^ím   #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Nom:^í    #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Gen:^ích  #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Dat:^ím   #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Acc:^í    #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Voc:^í    #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Loc:^ích  #;
+A+Masc+Pl+Ins:^ími  #;

+A+Mina+Sg+Nom:^í    #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Gen:^ího  #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Gen:^ieho #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Dat:^ímu  #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Dat:^iemu #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Acc:^í    #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Voc:^í    #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Loc:^ím   #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Loc:^iem  #;
+A+Mina+Sg+Ins:^ím   #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Nom:^í    #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Gen:^ích  #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Dat:^ím   #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Acc:^í    #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Voc:^í    #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Loc:^ích  #;
+A+Mina+Pl+Ins:^ími  #;

+A+Fem+Sg+Nom:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen:^ie  #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat:^iej #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc:^ú   #; ! Doloženo "božú" když je jinak "boží"
+A+Fem+Sg+Voc:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Loc:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Loc:^iej #;
+A+Fem+Sg+Ins:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Nom:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Gen:^ích #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Dat:^ím  #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Acc:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Acc:^ie  #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Voc:^í   #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Loc:^ích #;
+A+Fem+Pl+Ins:^ími #;

+A+Neut+Sg+Nom:^í    #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Nom:^ie   #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Gen:^ího  #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Gen:^ieho #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Dat:^ímu  #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Dat:^iemu #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Acc:^í    #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Acc:^ie   #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Voc:^í    #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Loc:^ím   #;
+A+Neut+Sg+Loc:^iem  #; ! "o božiem umučení"
+A+Neut+Sg+Ins:^ím   #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Nom:^í    #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Gen:^ích  #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Dat:^ím   #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Acc:^í    #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Voc:^í    #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Loc:^ích  #;
+A+Neut+Pl+Ins:^ími  #;

LEXICON AyStem
dobrý@D.SUP@+Pos:dobr@D.SUP@ Ay;
dobrý@D.SUP@+Pos:dobreh@D.SUP@ Ay;
důstojný:důstojn     AyDeg;
důstojný:dóstojn     AyDeg;
důstojný:duostojn    AyDeg;
lesní:lesk           AyDeg;
lidský:lidsk         AyDeg;
malý@D.SUP@+Pos:mal@D.SUP@ Ay;
malý+Comp:menš       Ai;
mladý:mlad           Ay1Deg;
mladý+Comp:mlazš     Ai;
nebeský:nebesk       AyDeg;
ohnivý:ohniv         AyDeg;
ohnivý:ohněv         AyDeg;
popový:popov         AyDeg;
propuštěný:propuščen AyDeg;
smrtelný:smrtedln    AyDeg;
starý:star           Ay1Deg;
veliký@D.SUP@+Pos:velik@D.SUP@ Ay;
veliký+Comp:větš     Ai;
vysoký@D.SUP@+Pos:vysok@D.SUP@ Ay;
vysoký+Comp:vyšš     Ai;
zelený:zelen         AyDeg;
židovský:židovsk     AyDeg;
bílý:biel          Ax;
černý:črn          Ax;
důstojný:důstojEn  Ax;
důstojný:dóstojEn  Ax;
důstojný:duostojEn Ax;
hotový:hotov       Ax;
křtěný:křtěn       Ax;
křtěný:křstěn      Ax;
lačný:lačEn        Ax;
mocný:mocEn        Ax;
nahý:náh           Ax;
náměsíčný:náměséčEn Ax;
nemocný:nemocEn    Ax;
nicí:nic           Ax;
plný:pln           Ax;
podobný:podobEn    Ax;
pokřtěný:pokřtěn   Ax;
pokřtěný:pokřstěn  Ax;
poslušný:poslušEn  Ax;
povinný:povinEn    Ax;
smutný:smutEn      Ax;
vinný:vinEn        Ax;
známý:znám         Ax;
živý:živ           Ax;
živý:žív           Ax;
žíznivý:žiezniv    Ax;
žíznivý:žiezliv    Ax;
